West Virginia, session 2026, HJR30.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE X. TAXATION AND FINANCE.§1d. Legislative Authority to Repeal Ad Valore Taxation on Homestead Real Property.Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, effective July 1, 2027, all ad valorem taxation on homestead real property is repealed.  Resolved further, That in accordance with the provisions of article 11, chapter three of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, such amendment is hereby numbered "Amendment No. 1" and designated as the "Amendment Authorizing the Legislature to Eliminate the Tax on Real Property" and the purpose of the proposed amendment is summarized as follows: "The purpose of this amendment is to permit the Legislature to eliminate all ad valorem taxation on homestead real property and to require the Legislature to create a mechanism to replace funding for counties receiving ad valorem taxation on homestead real property". NOTE: The purpose of this resolution is to permit the Legislature to repeal homestead real property tax and to require the Legislature create a mechanism to replace funding that counties receive from the homestead real property tax.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home